Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF397.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 9E.3, subsection 1, paragraphs e and f, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: e. The residential address of the eligible person, disclosure of which could lead to an increased risk of domestic abuse, domestic abuse assault, sexual abuse, assault, stalking, or human trafficking. If the eligible personâs residential address is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may provide the shelterâs name and other contact information in lieu of the shelterâs physical address. f. If mail cannot be delivered to the residential address of the eligible person, the address to which mail can be sent to the eligible person. If the eligible personâs mailing address is a shelter known to the program, the applicant may provide House File 397, p. 2 the shelterâs name and other contact information in lieu of the shelterâs physical address. Sec. 2. Section 9E.4, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2. The secretary shall cancel a program participantâs certification if the for any of the following reasons: a. The program participantâs application contains false information. b. The secretary receives information from a reliable source that the program participant has died. c. A program participant with legal documentation from a reliable source requests an adult member of a household to be removed from the program. An adult member of a household whose program certification is canceled is eligible to rejoin the program. Sec. 3. Section 9E.5, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 3. The secretary shall forward all mail sent to the designated address to the program participant. At the request of the program participant, the secretary may hold the program participantâs mail for up to thirty days. Sec. 4. Section 9E.6, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the following new paragraph: NEW PARAGRAPH . c. The state commissioner of elections or a county commissioner of elections shall cancel a program participantâs voter registration upon becoming aware of the program participantâs voter registration in another state. Sec. 5. Section 9E.6, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. A program participant who is otherwise eligible to vote may annually register with the state commissioner of elections as an absentee voter for the length of a program participantâs certification period . As soon as practicable before each election, the state commissioner of elections shall determine the precinct in which the residential address of the program participant is located and shall request and receive from the county commissioner of elections the ballot for that precinct and shall forward the absentee ballot to the program House File 397, p. 3 participant with the other materials for absentee balloting as required of the county commissioner of elections by section 53.8 . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 397, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor